Maryland, session 2026, SB0479.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
2–1601.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0479*

SENATE BILL 479
(b) (1) “Agricultural building” means a structure that is used primarily to
cultivate, manufacture, process, or produce agricultural crops, raw materials, products, or
commodities.
(2) “Agricultural building” includes a greenhouse.
(c) “Building” has the meaning stated in the International Building Code.
(d) “Commercial building” means a building that is subject to the commercial
provisions of the International Energy Conservation Code.
(e) (1) “Covered building” means a building that:
(i) 1. Is a commercial or multifamily residential building in the
State; or
2. Is owned by the State; and
(ii) Has a gross floor area of 35,000 square feet or more, excluding
the parking garage area.
(2) “Covered building” does not include:
(i) A building designated as a historic property under federal, State,
or local law;
(ii) A public or nonpublic elementary or secondary school building;
(iii) A hospital;
(iv) A manufacturing building; or
(v) An agricultural building.
(f) “Critical infrastructure” has the meaning stated in § 1–101 of the Public
Utilities Article.
(g) “Direct greenhouse gas emissions” means greenhouse gas emissions produced
on–site by covered buildings.
(h) “District energy” means thermal energy generated at one or more central
facilities that produce hot water, steam, or chilled water that then flows through a network
of insulated underground pipes to provide hot water, space heating, air conditioning, or
chilled water to nearby buildings.
(i) “Manufacturing building” means a facility in which manufacturing, as defined
in § 2–1202 of this article, takes place.

SENATE BILL 479 3
2–1602.
(a) [The] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION, THE Department
shall develop building energy performance standards for covered buildings that achieve:
(1) A 20% reduction in net direct greenhouse gas emissions on or before
January 1, 2030, as compared with 2025 levels for average buildings of similar construction;
and
(2) Net–zero direct greenhouse gas emissions on or before January 1, 2040.
(b) To facilitate the development of building energy performance standards under
this section, the Department shall require the owners of covered buildings to measure and
report direct emissions data to the Department annually beginning in 2025.
(c) (1) On or before June 1, 2023, the Department shall adopt regulations to
implement this section.
(2) Regulations adopted under this section shall:
(i) Subject to items (ii), (iii), (iv), and (v) of this paragraph AND
SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION, include energy use intensity targets by building type;
(ii) As necessary, include special provisions or exceptions to account
for:
1. Building age;
2. Regional differences;
3. The unique needs of particular building or occupancy
types, including health care facilities, laboratories, assisted living and nursing facilities,
military buildings, critical infrastructure, and buildings used in life sciences as defined in
§ 3–201 of the Economic Development Article;
4. The use of district energy systems and biofuels by covered
buildings;
5. Crediting the generation of on–site renewable energy by
covered buildings toward their energy use intensity targets;
6. Crediting the greenhouse gas reduction impact of the
on–site use of biomethane;

SENATE BILL 479
7. Excluding the energy use and greenhouse gas emissions
related to the production of steam for sterilization in a health care facility, laboratory,
assisted living and nursing facility, military building, or building used in life sciences; and
8. Excluding the energy use and greenhouse gas emissions
related to the generation of emergency backup power at a health care facility, laboratory,
assisted living and nursing facility, military building, critical infrastructure, or building
used in life sciences;
(iii) Consider the needs of the owners of covered buildings who:
1. Are not responsible for the design, modification, fixtures,
or equipment of commercial tenants;
2. Do not have access to or control over building energy
systems that are used or controlled by commercial tenants; or
3. Own buildings occupied by commercial tenants who are
responsible for all maintenance of and repairs to the buildings;
(iv) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, exempt from energy
use intensity targets a covered building that contains an area designed, built, and operated
as a permanent sensitive compartmented information facility and is operated by an agency
or contractor of:
1. The U.S. General Services Administration;
2. A. The U.S. Department of Defense;
B. The National Security Agency;
C. The U.S. Department of Homeland Security; or
D. Any other U.S. intelligence agency; or
3. The State;
(v) Exempt an owner of a covered building from energy use intensity
reporting requirements if:
1. The covered building meets the criteria under item (iv) of
this paragraph; and
2. In circumstances where tenant authorization is required,
the tenant or occupant does not provide energy use information to the owner of the covered
building due to concerns about the confidentiality of the building’s secure area;

SENATE BILL 479 5
(vi) Provide maximum flexibility to the owners of covered buildings
to comply with building energy performance standards;
(vii) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, include an alternative
compliance pathway allowing the owner of a covered building to pay a fee for greenhouse
gas emissions attributable to the building’s failure to meet direct greenhouse gas emissions
reduction targets;
(viii) To the extent authorized by law, include financial incentives
recommended by the Building Energy Transition Implementation Task Force; and
(ix) Include an annual reporting fee of $100 per covered building,
adjusted for inflation, to cover the administrative costs of the program.
(3) The Department may not set an alternative compliance fee that is less
than the social cost of greenhouse gases adopted by the Department or the U.S.
Environmental Protection Agency.
(4) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the Department
shall certify a building energy performance standards program adopted by a county
administering a building energy performance standards program on or before March 1,
2025, and waive the requirement for covered buildings in the county to comply with the
statewide program adopted under this section.
(ii) A county administering a building energy performance
standards program certified by the Department under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph
may take appropriate actions to enforce the standards, including:
1. Establishing alternative compliance pathways for
complying with energy use intensity and direct greenhouse gas emissions requirements
established in the standards;
2. Imposing and collecting alternative compliance fees up to
the same amount and in the same manner allowed by the Department under this section;
and
3. Imposing and collecting penalties up to the same amount
and in the same manner allowed by the Department under § 2–610 of this title.
(5) Nothing in this section shall preclude a county administering a building
energy performance standards program certified by the Department under paragraph (4)(i)
of this subsection from:
(i) Adopting building energy performance standards for buildings
that are not covered buildings under the statewide program adopted under this section; or
(ii) Modifying an adopted building performance standards program.

SENATE BILL 479
(d) Electric companies and gas companies shall provide energy data, including
whole–building and aggregate data, to the owners of covered buildings for benchmarking
purposes.
(e) In calculating the statewide standards developed by the Department under
this section, an owner of a covered building may not consider greenhouse gas emissions or
energy use by a commercial tenant of the covered building that:
(1) Is a food service facility as defined in COMAR 10.15.03.02; and
(2) Engages in commercial cooking and water heating.
(F) THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT REQUIRE A COVERED BUILDING THAT
RECEIVED A USE AND OCCUPANCY PERMIT BEFORE JUNE 1, 2022, TO COMPLY WITH
BUILDING ENERGY PERFORMANCE STANDARDS DEVELOPED UNDER OR ENERGY USE
INTENSITY TARGETS ADOPTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION UNTIL IT
BECOMES NECESSARY TO REPLACE LIGHTING SYSTEMS, HEATING, VENTILATING,
AND AIR CONDITIONING (HVAC) SYSTEMS, OR OTHER MAJOR COMPONENTS OF THE
COVERED BUILDING DUE TO THE FAILURE OF THOSE COMPONENTS OR AS A RESULT
OF THE END OF LIFE OF THOSE COMPONENTS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.